Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0956.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 Sec. 5. (1) A pawnbroker shall keep a record in English, at the time the pawnbroker receives any article of personal property or other valuable thing by way of pawn, that includes a description 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 of the article, a sequential transaction number, any amount of money loaned on the article, the name, residence, general description, and driver license number, official state personal identification card number, or government identification number of the person from whom the article was received, and the day and hour when the article was received. The record, the place where the business is carried on, and all articles of property in that place of business are subject to examination at any time by the attorney of the governmental unit, local police agency, the county prosecuting attorney of the county in which the governmental unit is situated, or the department of state police. (2) Upon the On receipt of any an article of personal property or other valuable thing by way of pawn, the pawnbroker shall make a permanent record of the transaction on a form provided by the pawnbroker that substantially complies with the form described in subsection (4). Each record of transaction shall must be completed in duplicate by the pawnbroker, legibly in the English language, and shall contain all applicable information required to complete the record of transaction form under subsection (4). This subsection does not prohibit the use and transmission of the information required in the record of the transaction by means of computer or other electronic media as permitted by the local police agency within the applicable governmental unit. (3) The pawnbroker shall retain a record of each transaction and, within not more than 48 hours after the property is received, shall send 1 copy of the record of transaction to the local police agency. (4) The record of transaction must include a writing that requires the pawner to list the pawner's race according to the 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Michigan data collection act and a form shall be that meets both of the following requirements: (a) Is 8-1/2 inches by 11 inches in size. and shall be as follows: (b) Is in the following form: RECORD OF TRANSACTION FRONT Article Serial No. Model No. or Case No. Lens No. or Move. No. Trade Name Color Size No. Jewels Material Stone Set Design Description No. Kind of Stone Size Inscription or Initials Purchase Price Amt. Loaned Dealer City Date Ticket No. Lady's [] Gent's[] Wrist [] Pocket[] Lapel[] BACK 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 Operator's License # or Other I.D. # Customer's Name (PRINT) Street No. or RFD City and State Employed By: Rolled print of right thumb (If impossible then some Age Height other fingerprint. Designate which.) Weight Race W [] B [] O [] Time Received: AM PM Mail reports within 48 hours to local officers [] Male [] Female Signature of person taking print Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S01234'25) or House Bill No. ____ (request no. H01234'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.